Georgia, session 2025_26, HB425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
imposition, rate, computation, exemptions, and credit, is amended by adding a new Code
section to read as follows:
"48-7-29.27.
(a)(1) The General Assembly finds and determines that Hurricane Helene has had a
catastrophic impact on the citizens and the economy of Georgia.
H. B. 425
- 1 -

LC 44 3034
(2) The General Assembly further finds and declares that it is appropriate and advisable
to ensure the state is better prepared for future weather events by incentivizing the
purchase and installation of generators in certain critical businesses such that the entire
region will be able to recover faster.
(b) For purposes of this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Convenience store' means a retail establishment which offers for sale packaged or
unprepared food and grocery items for consumption off the premises and may sell fuel
products, household items, or tobacco products. Such term shall not include
establishments that offer for sale more than 20 different cuts of refrigerated meats or
more than 50 types of whole produce.
(2) 'Emergency power generator and related components' means an alternate backup
power source that provides electricity during utility power outages. Such term shall refer
to any one or more of the following:
(A) A generator itself, whether fixed or mobile;
(B) Any transfer switch or switches; or
(C) The lines, fuel tanks, or other mechanisms needed to provide power to a generator
using diesel, natural gas, propane, or any other fuel source.
(3) 'Grocery store' means a retail establishment which offers for sale packaged or
unprepared food and grocery items for consumption off the premises and may sell fuel
products, household items, or tobacco products. Such term shall include establishments
that offer for sale more than 20 different cuts of refrigerated meats or more than 50 types
of whole produce.
(c) A taxpayer shall be allowed tax credits for expenditures made for the purchase,
installation, readying, or retrofitting of an emergency power generator and related
components against the tax imposed by Code Section 48-7-20 as follows:
(1) For a convenience store, in an amount equal to $100,000.00 per corporate entity;
provided, however, that the amount of the tax credit shall not exceed the amount the
H. B. 425
- 2 -

LC 44 3034
entity paid to purchase, install, and ready an emergency power generator and related
components. If a corporate entity owns more than one convenience store, the amount of
the tax credit shall be increased by $10,000.00 per store location up to a maximum of
$250,000.00 per corporate entity; and
(2) For a grocery store, in an amount equal to $700,000.00 per corporate entity;
provided, however, that the amount of the tax credit shall not exceed the amount the
entity paid to purchase, install, and ready an emergency power generator and related
components. If a corporate entity owns more than one grocery store, the amount of the
tax credit shall be increased by $25,000.00 per store location up to a maximum of
$1.5 million per corporate entity.
(d) In order to claim the tax credits provided for in this Code section, a taxpayer shall
attach to such taxpayer's state tax return certification from the taxpayer that the
requirements of this Code section have been met and any other information required by the
commissioner.
(e)(1) Any tax credits allowed pursuant to this Code section shall be claimed on or before
December 31, 2026.
(2)(A) The total amount of the tax credits allowed pursuant to this Code section for a
taxable year may exceed the taxpayer's income tax liability.
(B) Tax credits claimed pursuant to this Code section may be carried forward for ten
years from the close of the taxable year in which the credits are claimed, provided that
no such tax credit may be claimed after December 31, 2035.
(f)(1) A taxpayer claiming, transferring, or selling tax credits allowed pursuant to this
Code section shall be required to reimburse the department for any department initiated
audits relating to the tax credits, provided that such amount shall not exceed the value of
the credits claimed by the taxpayer. This paragraph shall not apply to routine tax audits
of such taxpayer that may include the review of the tax credits provided in this Code
section.
H. B. 425
- 3 -

LC 44 3034
(2) The commissioner may pursue all remedies available by law as necessary to
recapture tax credits wrongfully allowed, or claimed by a taxpayer or a taxpayer's
transferee.
(g) The commissioner shall be authorized to promulgate any rules and regulations
necessary to implement and administer this Code section."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 425
- 4 -